Idaho statutes. TITLE 34 ELECTIONS
CHAPTER 5
POLITICAL PARTIES — ORGANIZATION

Section.

34-501. “Political party” defined — Procedures for creation of a political party.

A “political party” within the meaning of this act, is an organization of electors under a given name. A political party shall be deemed created and qualified to participate in elections in any of the following three (3) ways:

By having three (3) or more candidates for state or national office listed under the party name at the last general election, provided that those individuals seeking the office of president, vice president and president elector shall be considered one candidate, or

By polling at the last general election for any one of its candidates for state or national office at least three per cent (3%) of the aggregate vote cast for governor or for presidential electors.

By an affiliation of electors who shall have signed a petition which shall:

State the name of the proposed party in not more than six (6) words;

State that the subscribers thereto desire to place the proposed party on the ballot;

Have attached thereto a sheet or sheets containing the signatures of at least a number of qualified electors equal to two per cent (2%) of the aggregate vote cast for presidential electors in the state at the previous general election at which presidential electors were chosen;

Be filed with the secretary of state on or before August 30 of even numbered years;

The format of the signature petition sheets shall be prescribed by the secretary of state and shall be patterned after, but not limited to, such sheets as used for state initiative and referendum measures;

The petitions and signatures so submitted shall be verified in the manner prescribed in section 34-1807, Idaho Code.

The petition shall be circulated no earlier than August 30 of the year preceding the general election.

Upon certification by the secretary of state that the petition has met the requirements of this act such party shall, under the party name chosen, have all the rights of a political party whose ticket shall have been on the ballot at the preceding general election.

The newly certified party shall proceed to hold a state convention in the manner provided by law; provided, that at the initial convention of any such political party, all members of the party shall be entitled to attend the convention and participate in the election of officers and the nominations of candidates. Thereafter the conduct of any subsequent convention shall be as provided by law.

34-502. County central committee — Members — Officers — Duties of chairman — Notice to chairman.

The county central committee of each political party in each county shall consist of the precinct committeemen representing the precincts within the county and the county chairman elected by the precinct committeemen. The precinct committeemen within each county shall meet at the county seat within ten (10) days after the primary election and at the time and date designated by the incumbent county chairman, and shall organize by electing a chairman, vice chairman, a secretary, a state committeeman, a state committeewoman, and such other officers as they may desire who shall hold office at the pleasure of the county central committee or until their successors are elected.

Unless state party rules, adopted as provided in section 34-505, Idaho Code, provide otherwise, when a vacancy exists in the office of county central committee chairman, it shall be the duty of the state central committee chairman to call a meeting of the precinct committeemen of the county, and the precinct committeemen shall proceed to elect a chairman of the county central committee for the balance of the unexpired term.

The county central committee shall fill by appointment all vacancies that occur or exist in the office of precinct committeeman who shall be a qualified elector of the precinct.

The county clerk shall deliver in writing to the chairman of the county central committee of each political party on or before January 20 of each year in which a general election is to be held, a list of the election precincts in the county and the names and addresses of the precinct committeemen who were elected at the last primary election, or who have since been appointed as precinct committeemen, as such election or appointment is shown on the records of the county clerk. If the county clerk has no record of precinct committeemen, he shall in writing, so inform the chairman of the county central committee.

The chairman of the county central committee shall on or before February 1 of each year in which a general election is to be held, and at such other times as changes occur, certify to the county clerk the names and addresses of the precinct committeemen of his political party.

34-503. Legislative district central committee — Membership — Officers.

The legislative district central committee of each political party in each legislative district shall consist of the precinct committeemen representing the precincts within the legislative district, and the legislative district chairman elected by the precinct committeemen. The precinct committeemen within each legislative district shall meet within the legislative district or at a convenient location in a legislative district contiguous to the legislative district, or at a convenient location in a county in which any portion of the legislative district sits, within eleven (11) days after the primary election, the meeting time and place to be designated by the incumbent legislative district chairman. At this meeting the precinct committeemen shall organize by electing a chairman, vice chairman, a secretary and such other officers as they may desire, who shall hold office at the pleasure of the legislative district central committee or until their successors are elected.

Unless state party rules, adopted as provided in section 34-506, Idaho Code, provide otherwise, when a vacancy exists in the office of legislative district central committee chairman, it shall be the duty of the state central committee chairman to call a meeting of the precinct committeemen of the legislative district, and the precinct committeemen shall proceed to elect a chairman of the legislative district central committee for the balance of the unexpired term.

34-504. State central committee — Membership.

The state central committee of each political party shall consist of all legislative district chairmen, all county central committee chairmen, all state committeemen, and state committeewomen selected by the county central committees. Each of the above members of the state central committee shall be entitled to vote at all meetings of the state central committee.

34-504A. Challengers and poll watchers. [Repealed.]

34-505. Powers and duties of county central committee.

The county central committee shall have all the powers and duties prescribed by state law and rules and regulations promulgated and adopted by the state conventions or the state central committee.

34-506. Powers and duties of legislative district central committee.

The legislative district central committee shall have all the powers and duties prescribed by state law and rules and regulations promulgated and adopted by the state conventions or the state central committee.

34-507. Selection of delegates to the state convention.

The delegates to the state convention of each political party shall be selected in the manner prescribed by rules and regulations promulgated and adopted by the state central committee.